Mississippi statutes. Title 15. Limitations of Actions and Prevention of Frauds
Article 1. In General.

§ 15-3-1.
Certain contracts to be in writing.

An action shall not be brought whereby to charge a defendant or other party:

upon any special promise to answer for the debt or default or miscarriage of another person;

upon any agreement made upon consideration of marriage, mutual promises to marry excepted;

upon any contract for the sale of lands, tenements, or hereditaments, or the making of any lease thereof for a longer term than one year;

upon any agreement which is not to be performed within the space of fifteen months from the making thereof; or

upon any special promise by an executor or administrator to answer any debt or damage out of his own estate;

unless, in each of said cases, the promise or agreement upon which such action may be brought, or some memorandum or note thereof, shall be in writing, and signed by the party to be charged therewith or signed by some person by him or her thereunto lawfully authorized in writing.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 47, art. 1 (1); 1857, ch. 44, art. 1; 1871, § 2892; 1880, § 1292; 1892, § 4225; 1906, § 4775; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3119; 1930, § 3343; 1942, § 264; Laws, 1926, ch. 152.

§ 15-3-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2006, ch. 371, § 13, effective from and after July 1, 2006.

[Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 47, art. 1 (2); 1857, ch. 44, art. 2; 1871, § 2893; 1880, § 1293; 1892, §§ 4226, 4227; 1906, §§ 4776, 4777; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3120, 3121; 1930, §§ 3344, 3345; 1942, §§ 265, 266.]

§ 15-3-5.
Fraudulent conveyances, judgments, loans and the like; exceptions.

Section 15-3-3 shall not extend to any estate or interest in any lands, goods or chattels, or any rents, common, or profit out of the same, which shall be upon good consideration and bona fide lawfully conveyed or assured to any person or persons, bodies-politic or corporate, nor shall it in any case extend to creditors whose debts were contracted after such fraudulent act, unless made with intent to defraud them, and though a conveyance or contract be decreed void as to prior creditors, it shall not, on that account, be void as to subsequent creditors or purchasers.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 47, art. 1 (3); 1857, ch. 44, art. 3; 1871, § 2894; 1880, § 1294; 1892, § 4228; 1906, § 4778; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3122; 1930, § 3346; 1942, § 267.

§ 15-3-7.
Property of improperly disclosed principal or partner to be treated as property of one ostensibly transacting business.

If a person shall transact business as a trader or otherwise, with the addition of the words “agent,” “factor,” “and company,” or “& Co.,” or like words, and fail to disclose the name of his principal or partner by a sign in letters easy to be read, placed conspicuously at the house where such business is transacted, or if a person shall transact business in his own name without any such addition, all the property, stock, money and choses in action used or acquired in such business shall, as to the creditors of such person, be liable for his debts, and be in all respects treated in favor of his creditors as his property. However, the provisions of this section shall not apply to a refrigerated box, vending machine or other container when placed by a person, firm, or corporation in a store, mercantile establishment, or other place of business to be used therein, where said refrigerated box, vending machine, or other container is plainly marked with a sign, painted on or attached to and prominently displayed on such property, showing said property to be the property of the person, firm, or corporation, placing the same therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1300; 1892, § 4234; 1906, § 4784; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3128; 1930, § 3352; 1942, § 273; Laws, 1956, ch. 208.

§ 15-3-9.
Creditors to be notified of destruction of insured stock of merchandise by fire.

In case of the destruction of a stock of merchandise by fire upon which there is insurance against such loss, the holder of such insurance policies shall within five days after such loss notify his creditors to whom he is indebted for merchandise, of his loss and the amount of insurance carried, and no such policy or policies of insurance shall be transferred or assigned for ten days after such notice, and no such insurance shall be paid for fifteen days next after the occurrence of any such fire.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3130; 1930, § 3354; 1942, § 276; Laws, 1908, ch. 100.

§ 15-3-11.
Actions on contracts made during infancy.

An action shall not be maintained whereby to charge any person upon any promise made after full age to pay any debt contracted during infancy, or upon any ratification after full age of any promise or contract made during infancy, unless such promise or ratification shall be made by some writing, signed by the person to be charged therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 44, art. 8; 1871, § 2898; 1880, § 1298; 1892, § 4232; 1906, § 4782; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3126; 1930, § 3350; 1942, § 271.

§ 15-3-13.
Chapter is not applicable to official sales.

Nothing in this article shall apply to official sales by sheriffs, constables, executors, administrators, guardians, receivers, commissioners, trustees in bankruptcy, or any public officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3131; 1930, § 3355; 1942, § 277; Laws, 1908, ch. 100.

§ 15-3-15.
Effect of chapter on rules of evidence or presumptions of law.

Except as especially provided, nothing contained in this article, nor any act thereunder, shall change or affect the present rules of evidence or the present presumptions of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3132; 1930, § 3356; 1942, § 278; Laws, 1908, ch. 100.